Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.065

Rules, policies, and orders—Secretary's role.

The secretary of health shall review and coordinate all proposed rules, interpretive statements, policy statements, and declaratory orders, as defined in chapter 34.05 RCW, that are proposed for adoption or issuance by any health profession board or commission vested with rule-making authority identified under RCW 18.130.040(2)(b). The secretary shall review the proposed policy statements and declaratory orders against criteria that include the effect of the proposed rule, statement, or order upon existing health care policies and practice of health professionals. Within thirty days of the receipt of a proposed rule, interpretive statement, policy statement, or declaratory order from the originating board or commission, the secretary shall inform the board or commission of the results of the review, and shall provide any comments or suggestions that the secretary deems appropriate. Emergency rule making is not subject to this review process. The secretary is authorized to adopt rules and procedures for the coordination and review under this section.

[ 1995 c 198 s 26.]